Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska39-826.01
Proposed bridge or culvert; dam in lieu of; how determined.

The Department of Transportation or the county board shall, prior to the design or construction of a new bridge or culvert in a new or existing highway or road within its jurisdiction, notify in writing, by first-class mail, the natural resources district in which such bridge or culvert will be located. The natural resources district shall, pursuant to section 39-826.02, determine whether it would be beneficial to the district to have a dam constructed in lieu of the proposed bridge or culvert. If the district shall determine that a dam would be more beneficial, the department or the county board and the natural resources district shall jointly determine the feasibility of constructing a dam to support the road in lieu of a bridge or culvert. If the department or the county board and the natural resources district cannot agree regarding the feasibility of a dam, the decision of the department, in the case of the state highway system, or the county board, in the case of the county road system, shall be controlling.

Laws 1979, LB 213, § 1;

Laws 2017, LB339, § 112.